Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.090

Dissolution, how accomplished.

No dissolution of a limited partnership shall take place except by operation of law, before the time specified in the certificate of partnership, unless a notice of such dissolution, subscribed by the general and special partners is filed with the original certificate of partnership or the certificate, if any, renewing or continuing such partnership nor unless a copy of such notice be published for the time and in the manner prescribed for the publication of the certificate of partnership.

[ 1955 c 15 s 25.12.090. Prior: 1869 p 382 s 9; RRS s 9974.]